Massachusetts, session 194th, H1637.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 231 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 85BB the following section:- 
Section 85CC. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no duly 
licensed or certified law enforcement officer, as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E, or 
ambulance, emergency medical technician or other person or entity providing ambulance service 
or emergency medical services, as those terms are defined in section 1 of chapter 111C, shall be 
subject to any claim, liability or penalty for transporting a person to a community behavioral 
health center, as defined in section 13D½ of chapter 118E.